src/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!! ---------------
!! Adverbs in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON ADV_
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON ADV_А 
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>раҡ # ;

LEXICON ADV_ӘД
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>ерәк # ;

LEXICON ADV_АҘ
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>ыраҡ # ;

LEXICON ADV_ӨҘ
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>өрәк # ;

LEXICON ADV_Е
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>рәк # ;

LEXICON ADV_ОҠ
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>ораҡ # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
