src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON Adverbs
тураға ADV_А ;
ятлайға ADV_А ;
тиктомалға ADV_А ;
уңға-һулға:уңға-#һулға ADV_А ;
быуындан-быуынға:быуындан-#быуынға ADV_А ;
шуға ADV_А ;
ҡапылда ADV_А ;
унда-һанда:унда-#һанда ADV_А ;
бында ADV_А ;
йылдың-йылында:йылдың-#йылында ADV_А ;
минутында ADV_А ;
ыңғайҙа ADV_А ;
ормаһарҙа ADV_А ;
таҡа ADV_А ;
ҡарамаҡҡа ADV_А ;
алъюҫыҡҡа ADV_А ;
остан-осҡа:остан-#осҡа ADV_А ;
ятҡа ADV_А ;
шыҡа ADV_А ;
элә-сала:элә-#сала ADV_А ;
эләгә-йығыла:эләгә-#йығыла ADV_А ;
бәрелә-йышыла:бәрелә-#йышыла ADV_А ;
манма ADV_А ;
әйләнә-тулғана:әйләнә-#тулғана ADV_А ;
хәлисана ADV_А ;
буйынан-буйына:буйынан-#буйына ADV_А ;
ҡапылғара ADV_А ;
икәү-ара:икәү-#ара ADV_А ;
ята-тора:ята-#тора ADV_А ;
ҡыра ADV_А ;
мордваса ADV_А ;
уғаса ADV_А ;
ҡыҫҡаса ADV_А ;
сағыштырмаса ADV_А ;
ҡырғыҙса ADV_А ;
мариса ADV_А ;
большевикса ADV_А ;
ҡарағалпаҡса ADV_А ;
социализмса ADV_А ;
ҡутарғанса ADV_А ;
һанса ADV_А ;
японса ADV_А ;
уныҡынса ADV_А ;
тулыһынса ADV_А ;
китапса ADV_А ;
феодалдарса ADV_А ;
дошмандарса ADV_А ;
ҡыҙҙарса ADV_А ;
атайҙарса ADV_А ;
суфыйҙарса ADV_А ;
ораторҙарса ADV_А ;
батырҙарса ADV_А ;
ололарса ADV_А ;
татарса ADV_А ;
алйоттарса ADV_А ;
белорусса ADV_А ;
сыуашса ADV_А ;
йырҙағыса ADV_А ;
шартлыса ADV_А ;
үлә-бата:үлә-#бата ADV_А ;
ҡыҙыулата ADV_А ;
башта ADV_А ;
эҙһеҙ ADV_ӘД ;
миҙгелһеҙ ADV_ӘД ;
көндөҙ ADV_ӨҘ ;
көпә-көндөҙ:көпә-#көндөҙ ADV_ӨҘ ;
йөҙмә-йөҙ:йөҙмә-#йөҙ ADV_ӨҘ ;
күҙ-күҙ:күҙ-#күҙ ADV_ӘД ;
ваҡытлы-ваҡытһыҙ:ваҡытлы-#ваҡытһыҙ ADV_АҘ ;
әбдән-мәңге:әбдән-#мәңге ADV_Е ;
ғәмәлдәге ADV_Е ;
үҙле-үҙе:үҙле-#үҙе ADV_Е ;
үҙенән-үҙе:үҙенән-#үҙе ADV_Е ;
аңҡы-тиңке:аңҡы-#тиңке ADV_Е ;
апалы-энеле:апалы-#энеле ADV_Е ;
кирле-мирле:кирле-#мирле ADV_Е ;
йүнле-рәтле:йүнле-#рәтле ADV_Е ;
әүәле ADV_Е ;
ғүмере ADV_Е ;
эскәре ADV_Е ;
кисте ADV_Е ;
һәргиз ADV_ӘД ;
биғәйни ADV_А ;
салғай ADV_АҘ ;
йылдай ADV_АҘ ;
балтырғандай ADV_АҘ ;
яландай ADV_АҘ ;
суйындай ADV_АҘ ;
аяһындай ADV_АҘ ;
ауыҙҙай ADV_АҘ ;
тулҡындарҙай ADV_АҘ ;
мамыҡтарҙай ADV_АҘ ;
сылбырҙай ADV_АҘ ;
таҡай-тоҡай:таҡай-#тоҡай ADV_АҘ ;
урҙалай ADV_АҘ ;
таҫмалай ADV_АҘ ;
ҡыҙлай ADV_АҘ ;
улай ADV_АҘ ;
былай ADV_АҘ ;
ҡарасҡылай ADV_АҘ ;
арбаһылай ADV_АҘ ;
арымай-талмай:арымай-#талмай ADV_АҘ ;
йомғаҡтай ADV_АҘ ;
ҡурсаҡтай ADV_АҘ ;
суҡтай ADV_АҘ ;
ысыҡтай ADV_АҘ ;
йыртҡыстай ADV_АҘ ;
бриллианттай ADV_АҘ ;
ҡамыштай ADV_АҘ ;
юрый ADV_АҘ ;
күлдәй ADV_ӘД ;
килендәй ADV_ӘД ;
күҙәүендәй ADV_ӘД ;
йәшендәй ADV_ӘД ;
төндәй ADV_ӘД ;
зәғферәндәй ADV_ӘД ;
диңгеҙҙәй ADV_ӘД ;
берҙәй ADV_ӘД ;
гөлдәрҙәй ADV_ӘД ;
сүмәкәй ADV_ӘД ;
өйөңдәгеләй ADV_ӘД ;
икенселәй ADV_ӘД ;
башкөлләй ADV_ӘД ;
өйөрөләй ADV_ӘД ;
китешләй ADV_ӘД ;
дөйәләй ADV_ӘД ;
ғаиләләй ADV_ӘД ;
энәләй ADV_ӘД ;
фәрештәләй ADV_ӘД ;
өндәшмәй-нитмәй:өндәшмәй-#нитмәй ADV_ӘД ;
һөлөктәй ADV_ӘД ;
елбәҙәктәй ADV_ӘД ;
тирәктәй ADV_ӘД ;
көптәй ADV_ӘД ;
һөттәй ADV_ӘД ;
көмөштәй ADV_ӘД ;
асыҡтан-тишек:асыҡтан-#тишек ADV_ӘД ;
иртүк:иртүк ADV_АҘ ;
күберәк:күберәк ADV_ӘД ;
һирәк-һирәк:һирәк-#һирәк ADV_ӘД ;
ҡуңалтаҡ:ҡуңалтаҡ ADV_АҘ ;
ашыҡ-бошоҡ:ашыҡ-#бошоҡ ADV_ОҠ ;
урыҡ-һурыҡ:урыҡ-#һурыҡ ADV_АҘ ;
тоҡтомал ADV_АҘ ;
миҙгел-миҙгел:миҙгел-#миҙгел ADV_ӘД ;
филасыл ADV_АҘ ;
ләл-ләл:ләл-#ләл ADV_ӘД ;
әүәл ADV_ӘД ;
тором-тором:тором-#тором ADV_ОҠ ;
мөлөм ADV_ӨҘ ;
буйтым ADV_АҘ ;
берәм-һәрәм:берәм-#һәрәм ADV_ӘД ;
ҡапылдан ADV_АҘ ;
ысындан ADV_АҘ ;
ҡатарҙан ADV_АҘ ;
йәнфарман ADV_АҘ ;
унан-бынан:унан-#бынан ADV_АҘ ;
баянан ADV_АҘ ;
хосусан ADV_АҘ ;
аңламаҫтан ADV_АҘ ;
баштан ADV_АҘ ;
рухан ADV_АҘ ;
әкрен-әкрен:әкрен-#әкрен ADV_ӘД ;
иртәгеһен ADV_ӘД ;
борон ADV_ОҠ ;
борон-борон:борон-#борон ADV_ОҠ ;
кисҡорон ADV_ОҠ ;
элеккегөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
бөгөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
өлөкөгөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көндөҙөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көҙөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
яҙын-көҙөн:яҙын-#көҙөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көндән-көн:көндән-#көн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көндә-көн:көндә-#көн ADV_ӨҘ ;
төнөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көнөн-төнөн:көнөн-#төнөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
әпен-төпөн:әпен-#төпөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көн-төн:көн-#төн ADV_ӨҘ ;
бөйөртөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
лыпын ADV_АҘ ;
ҡышҡыһын ADV_АҘ ;
күңелдән ADV_ӘД ;
тиҙҙән ADV_ӘД ;
ҡәтғиән ADV_ӘД ;
әмән ADV_ӘД ;
гөппәһенән ADV_ӘД ;
борадәрән ADV_ӘД ;
элек-электән:элек-#электән ADV_ӘД ;
өҫтән ADV_ӘД ;
инер-инмәҫтән:инер-#инмәҫтән ADV_ӘД ;
шәйләмәҫтән ADV_ӘД ;
арҡыры-торҡоро:арҡыры-#торҡоро ADV_А ;
осто-көйҙө:осто-#көйҙө ADV_Е ;
көнө ADV_Е ;
усмалап:усмалап ADV_АҘ ;
немецсалап:немецсалап ADV_АҘ ;
вареньелап:вареньелап ADV_АҘ ;
яйлап:яйлап ADV_АҘ ;
тоҡлап-тоҡлап:тоҡлап-#тоҡлап ADV_АҘ ;
ҡуллап:ҡуллап ADV_АҘ ;
сезонлап:сезонлап ADV_АҘ ;
быуын-быуынлап:быуын-#быуынлап ADV_АҘ ;
литрлап:литрлап ADV_АҘ ;
баҫҡыслап:баҫҡыслап ADV_АҘ ;
ботлап:ботлап ADV_АҘ ;
алмашлап:алмашлап ADV_АҘ ;
яртылап:яртылап ADV_АҘ ;
һырлап-һыйпап:һырлап-#һыйпап ADV_АҘ ;
һығылып-һыҡтап:һығылып-#һыҡтап ADV_АҘ ;
бәләкәйләнеп-кесерәйеп:бәләкәйләнеп-#кесерәйеп ADV_ӘД ;
талпынып-елпенеп:талпынып-#елпенеп ADV_ӘД ;
ҡырып-емереп:ҡырып-#емереп ADV_ӘД ;
күреп-ишетеп:күреп-#ишетеп ADV_ӘД ;
абынып-нитеп:абынып-#нитеп ADV_ӘД ;
һөйләшеп-гөрләшеп:һөйләшеп-#гөрләшеп ADV_ӘД ;
дүртәүләшеп:дүртәүләшеп ADV_ӘД ;
ашығып-бошоғоп:ашығып-#бошоғоп ADV_ОҠ ;
өҙөп-йолҡоп:өҙөп-#йолҡоп ADV_ОҠ ;
тартып-йолҡоп:тартып-#йолҡоп ADV_ОҠ ;
ҡаҙып-соҡоп:ҡаҙып-#соҡоп ADV_ОҠ ;
юғалып-онотолоп:юғалып-#онотолоп ADV_ОҠ ;
йәшенеп-боҫоноп:йәшенеп-#боҫоноп ADV_ОҠ ;
аҫылынып-тотоноп:аҫылынып-#тотоноп ADV_ОҠ ;
бәреп-ороп:бәреп-#ороп ADV_ОҠ ;
ҡасып-боҫоп:ҡасып-#боҫоп ADV_ОҠ ;
янып-көйөп:янып-#көйөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
ҡурҡып-өркөп:ҡурҡып-#өркөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
өҙөлөп-өҙөлөп:өҙөлөп-#өҙөлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
йырлап-көлөп:йырлап-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
уйнап-көлөп:уйнап-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
йылмайып-көлөп:йылмайып-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
шатланып-көлөп:шатланып-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
шаярып-көлөп:шаярып-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
өйрөлөп-сөйрөлөп:өйрөлөп-#сөйрөлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
аңлап-төшөнөп:аңлап-#төшөнөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
ҡырып-һөрөп:ҡырып-#һөрөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
семетеп-өтөп:семетеп-#өтөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
этеп-төртөп:этеп-#төртөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
өрөп-һөртөп:өрөп-#һөртөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
һөйләшеп-көлөшөп:һөйләшеп-#көлөшөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
йыйып-һуғып:йыйып-#һуғып ADV_АҘ ;
арып-талып:арып-#талып ADV_АҘ ;
ҡысҡырып-тауышланып:ҡысҡырып-#тауышланып ADV_АҘ ;
инәлеп-ялбарып:инәлеп-#ялбарып ADV_АҘ ;
ҡырып-ватып:ҡырып-#ватып ADV_АҘ ;
ҡыҙып-ярһып:ҡыҙып-#ярһып ADV_АҘ ;
алтаулашып:алтаулашып ADV_АҘ ;
йөҙләп:йөҙләп ADV_ӘД ;
ижекләп:ижекләп ADV_ӘД ;
һирәкләп:һирәкләп ADV_ӘД ;
әкрен-әкренләп:әкрен-#әкренләп ADV_ӘД ;
күпләп:күпләп ADV_ӘД ;
өсәрләп:өсәрләп ADV_ӘД ;
йолҡҡолап-өҙгөсләп:йолҡҡолап-#өҙгөсләп ADV_ӘД ;
икәүләп:икәүләп ADV_ӘД ;
бергәләп:бергәләп ADV_ӘД ;
нәхеүсәләп:нәхеүсәләп ADV_ӘД ;
шәп-шәп:шәп-#шәп ADV_ӘД ;
шатор-шотор:шатор-#шотор ADV_ОҠ ;
өҙөлдөр ADV_ӨҘ ;
кәштер-көштөр:кәштер-#көштөр ADV_ӨҘ ;
әштер-өштөр:әштер-#өштөр ADV_ӨҘ ;
көңгөр-ҡаңғыр:көңгөр-#ҡаңғыр ADV_АҘ ;
битәр ADV_ӘД ;
тас ADV_АҘ ;
көйөҫ-көйөҫ:көйөҫ-#көйөҫ ADV_ӨҘ ;
китер-китмәҫ:китер-#китмәҫ ADV_ӘД ;
сырт ADV_АҘ ;
шәйәт ADV_ӘД ;
сирекләү ADV_А ;
тайыш-тойош:тайыш-#тойош ADV_ОҠ ;
тотош ADV_ОҠ ;
өҙөлөш ADV_ӨҘ ;
йәнәш ADV_ӘД ;
һалҡы ADV_А ;
әсәле-уллы:әсәле-#уллы ADV_А ;
йылдың-йылы:йылдың-#йылы ADV_А ;
тышҡары ADV_А ;
ваҡыты-ваҡыты:ваҡыты-#ваҡыты ADV_А ;
мәртәбә ADV_Е ;
мәңге-мәңгегә:мәңге-#мәңгегә ADV_Е ;
кирегә ADV_Е ;
көс-хәлгә:көс-#хәлгә ADV_Е ;
берһегөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
берһегөнгә ADV_Е ;
абына-һөрлөгә:абына-#һөрлөгә ADV_Е ;
ғүмергә ADV_Е ;
тикмәгә ADV_Е ;
йәнәшәгә ADV_Е ;
йәнәшәһендә ADV_Е ;
төндә ADV_Е ;
үткәндә ADV_Е ;
тәүҙә ADV_Е ;
кәләшлеккә ADV_Е ;
кискә ADV_Е ;
тиктәҫкә ADV_Е ;
саба-елә:саба-#елә ADV_Е ;
тәпәнлә ADV_Е ;
әүлә ADV_Е ;
йәнәшәлә ADV_Е ;
селпәрәмә ADV_Е ;
энәһенән-ебенә:энәһенән-#ебенә ADV_Е ;
иртәгәһенә ADV_Е ;
бәйнә-бәйнә:бәйнә-#бәйнә ADV_Е ;
өҫтө-өҫтөнә:өҫтө-#өҫтөнә ADV_Е ;
наҙлана-иркәләнә:наҙлана-#иркәләнә ADV_Е ;
вата-емерә:вата-#емерә ADV_Е ;
кәррә ADV_Е ;
үҙебеҙсә ADV_Е ;
йәйгесә ADV_Е ;
көндәгесә ADV_Е ;
дәрестәгесә ADV_Е ;
элеккесә ADV_Е ;
кисә ADV_Е ;
еңелсә ADV_Е ;
ҡәҙимсә ADV_Е ;
үҙенсә ADV_Е ;
ғәҙәтенсә ADV_Е ;
белгәнсә ADV_Е ;
фәләнсә ADV_Е ;
беҙҙеңсә ADV_Е ;
һинеңсә ADV_Е ;
берсә ADV_Е ;
вәхшиҙәрсә ADV_Е ;
әсәләрсә ADV_Е ;
сәғәттәрсә ADV_Е ;
сәнғәтсә ADV_Е ;
өлөшсә ADV_Е ;
хәҙергәсә ADV_Е ;
күпселектә ADV_Е ;
һәғәттә ADV_Е ;
үтә ADV_Е ;
икеләтә ADV_Е ;
йөрөкләтә ADV_Е ;
өсләтә ADV_Е ;
нәмәләтә ADV_Е ;
йәнәшә ADV_Е ;
һуя ADV_А ;
